Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. Congressional, Senatorial, and House of Delegates Districts.
§ 24.2-304.
Repealed by Acts 2001, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1.

Editor’s note.

The repeal of this section was subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice, pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. The repeal was precleared on June 15, 2001.

§§ 24.2-304.01,
24.2-304.02.

Repealed by Acts 2011, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 2, effective April 29, 2011.

Cross references.

As to current composition of house of delegates districts, see §

24.2-304.03

.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

24.2-304.01

and 24.2-304.02 were repealed by Acts 2011, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 2, effective April 29, 2011, pursuant to Va. Const., Art. II, § 6.

Acts 2011, Special Session I, c. 1 was subject to preclearance by the Department of Justice, pursuant to section 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act. Preclearance was granted by letter dated June 17, 2011.

Former §§

24.2-304.01

and 24.2-304.02, pertaining to House of Delegates districts, were derived from Acts 2001, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1 and Acts 2003, c. 903; 2004, cc. 20, 451, 479, 932; 2005, c. 658; 2006, cc. 240, 261, respectively.